California, session 20252026, AB1642.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Wildfire Environmental Safety and Testing Act.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares the following:(a) Wildfires are increasingly frequent and severe, exposing Californians to hazardous smoke, ash, debris, and toxic contamination that pose serious short- and long-term health risks.(b) Following wildfires, residents, workers, students, and vulnerable populations are often compelled to return to homes, schools, and workplaces without adequate environmental testing, remediation, or health-based clearance standards.(c) Existing law does not provide a uniform statewide framework to address postwildfire habitability and reoccupancy based on public health exposure.SEC. 3. Part 3 (commencing with Section 13980) is added to Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code, to read:PART 3. Wildfires Contamination13980. For purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Clearance” means a formal determination that a home, school, workplace, or other structure has been cleared of WUI debris and that any remaining hazardous chemicals meet the standards established pursuant to this part.(b) “Contamination” means property polluted by WUI debris.(c) “Department” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.(d) “Downwind ash zone” means the geographic area downwind from the wildfire’s burn perimeter that the department determines pursuant to Section 13985 is reasonably likely to have received ash, soot, or char, or other WUI debris carried by wind. “Downwind ash zone” includes the structures within that geographic area.(e) “Hazardous chemical” means a chemical that is determined by the department to be toxic, carcinogenic, explosive, corrosive, or flammable.(f) “Office” means the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.(g) “TEM-identified asbestos” means Transmission Electron Microscopy-identified asbestos.(h) “WUI” means the term used by the United States Fire Administration and the Federal Emergency Management Agency to mean the wildland urban interface, or the zone of transition between unoccupied land and human development. “WUI” includes the line, area, or zone where structures and other human development meet or intermingle with undeveloped wildland or vegetative fuels.(i) “WUI debris” includes, but is not limited to, ash, soot, or char, combustion byproducts, TEM-identified asbestos, CAM 17 heavy metals, cyanide, lithium, manganese, dioxins, furans, and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs), and volatile organic compounds in indoor air.(j) “WUI fire” or “wildfire” means a fire in the WUI that may result in the release and deposit of WUI debris.(j)(k) “WUI impact zone” means the WUI area plus within the maximum fire perimeter of as determined and mapped by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection’s Damage Inspection Data map area Protection and the adjacent downwind ash zone, as defined by the department pursuant to Section 13985.13981. (a) There is a nonrebuttable presumption that a home, school, workplace, or other structure is safe for human occupancy after a wildfire only if the levels level of lead and TEM-identified asbestos on an indoor surface meet both of the following conditions: is less than, or equal to, 5 micrograms per square foot on floors, and less than, or equal to, 40 micrograms per square foot on window sills.(1)For lead, less than, or equal to, 5 micrograms per square foot on floors, and less than, or equal to, 40 micrograms per square foot on window sills.(2)For TEM-identified asbestos, less than, or equal to, one structure per square centimeter.(b) The department may adopt nonemergency regulations pursuant to Section 13984 through the regular rulemaking process for science-informed, health-based standards for lead and TEM-identified asbestos that are stricter than those specified in subdivision (a). Upon adoption of those nonemergency regulations, this section shall become inoperative.13982. (a) The department, in consultation with relevant coordinating agencies, shall, no later than July 1, 2027, adopt emergency regulations specifying the science-informed, health-based standards for investigation, environmental testing, and clearance, to guide the adequate removal of lead and TEM-identified asbestos inside and outside of homes, schools, workplaces, and other structures in residential areas after a wildfire.(b) The adoption and readoption of regulations consistent with this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action.13983. Emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 13982, in order to protect the public health of residents of standing homes, schools, workplaces, or other structures after a WUI fire and to prevent the onset of new reduce cancer cases and noncancer health risks attributable to a WUI fire, shall include all of the following:(a) A rebuttable presumption that if WUI debris is present in a surviving home, school, workplace, or other structure after a WUI fire, any identified hazardous contamination in the WUI impact zone is the result of that WUI fire.(b) (1) Requirements for testing for lead and TEM-identified asbestos in a surviving home, school, workplace, or other structure that include, at a minimum, testing of all of the following locations:(A) Indoor floors, window sills, and interior horizontal hard surfaces.(B) Garage floors and garage horizontal hard surfaces.(C) Attics, and heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning systems.(2) Testing standards shall also include conditions in which testing behind drywall is required.(c) (1) Requirements for preremediation testing to understand where contaminants are present to guide appropriately licensed cleanup efforts and ensure worker safety.(2) Requirements for postremediation testing after debris cleanup to confirm that lead and TEM-identified asbestos have been removed from the home, school, workplace, or other structure and that clearance has been achieved, or to determine that further remediation efforts are required.(3) Requirements for postremediation testing after debris cleanup to confirm whether remediation reduced the levels of chemicals identified in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (4).(4) Preremediation and postremediation testing standards shall include testing for guidelines that shall establish specific protocols and methodologies used to evaluate known WUI fire hazards, including which include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(A) Lead.(B) TEM-identified asbestos.(C) Combustion byproducts.(D) CAM 17 heavy metals.(E) Cyanide, lithium, manganese, dioxins, furans, and PAHs.(F) Volatile organic compounds in indoor air. (d) The standards set forth in the department’s Residential Soil Evaluation Guidance for the 2025 Los Angeles Wildfires, including the standards for soil sampling based on property damage levels.(e) Guidance on the use of other restoration strategies, including, but not limited to, the repair or replacement of damaged structures if remediation cannot achieve clearance.(f) Guidance on methods and routines to reduce indoor exposure to the contamination of hazardous chemicals, or any residual contamination following remediation, resulting from a WUI fire.13984. (a) The department shall, no later than July 1, 2028, adopt regulations specifying science-informed, health-based standards for hazardous chemicals, including levels for these chemicals that are required to achieve clearance for a home, school, workplace, or other structure, as well as standards for investigation, environmental testing, and to guide the removal of hazardous chemicals inside and outside of a home, school, workplace, or other structure in a residential area after a wildfire. The adopted science-informed, health-based standards for hazardous chemicals shall be established at levels intended to ensure that residents can safely reoccupy their homes, schools, workplaces, and other structures and to prevent the onset of new reduce cancer cases and noncancer health risks attributable to a WUI fire. The department shall develop these standards in consultation with the office.(b) Regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section, in order to protect the public health of residents of standing homes, schools, workplaces, or other structures after a WUI fire, shall include all of the following:(1) Adoption of nonemergency regulations from regulations adopted pursuant to Sections 13982 and 13983, and standards for levels of lead and TEM-identified asbestos on an indoor surface pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13981, if applicable. applicable and appropriate.(2) A rebuttable presumption that if WUI debris is present in a surviving home, school, workplace, or other structure after a WUI fire, any identified hazardous contamination in the WUI impact zone is the result of that WUI fire.(3) (A) Requirements for testing in a surviving home, school, workplace, or other structure that include, at a minimum, testing of all of the following locations:(i) Indoor floors, window sills, and interior horizontal hard surfaces.(ii) Garage floors and garage horizontal hard surfaces.(iii) Attics and heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning systems.(B) Testing standards shall also include conditions in which testing behind drywall is required.(4) (A) Requirements for preremediation testing to understand what hazardous chemicals are present to guide appropriately licensed cleanup efforts and ensure worker safety.(B) Requirements for postremediation testing after debris cleanup to confirm that WUI debris and contamination have been removed from the home, school, workplace, or other structure, or to determine that further remediation efforts are required.(C) Preremediation and postremediation testing standards shall include testing and health-based thresholds for known WUI fire hazards, including including, but not limited to, all of the following:(i) TEM-identified asbestos.(ii) Combustion byproducts.(iii) CAM 17 heavy metals.(iv) Cyanide, lithium, manganese, dioxins, furans, and PAHs.(v) Volatile organic compounds in indoor air.(5) Standards to ensure that individuals can inhabit a home, school, workplace, or other structure is safe to inhabit. safely. The standards shall include steps to ensure that a home, school, workplace, or other structure is habitable to prefire conditions and that the home, school, workplace, or other structure has reached clearance before a resident is required to move back into the resident’s home or return to a structure.13985. The department shall determine the downwind ash zone for each WUI fire using methodologies and data sources, including maps, from the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, within 45 days of the wildfire reaching 100 percent containment.